District of Columbia statutes.
39-206

Miscellaneous provisions.

(a)

The Mayor shall instruct the Office of Management and Budget Systems to coordinate with the Commission the establishment of a bookkeeping and accounting system to allow for swift transference of grant monies from the District government to a recipient, and shall instruct that Office, in concert with the Commission, to establish a voucher system which would also allow for the swift transference of funds from the District government to grant recipients.

(b)

Nominees for the Commission shall be residents of the District of Columbia.

(c)

The Commission shall establish procedures in its bylaws to handle conflicts of interest in the awarding of grants, when any commissioner has either a structural or fiduciary relationship with a grantee.

Oct. 21, 1975, D.C. Law 1-22, § 7, 22 DCR 2088

History

1981 Ed., § 31-2006.
1973 Ed., § 31-1906.

Prior Codifications